Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.100

License—Form—Restrictions.

Every license issued shall specify the name of the person to whom it is issued and shall be displayed in his or her place of business in an area accessible to the public. No license shall be assigned, and not more than one person shall carry on the profession or business of funeral directing or embalming under one license.

[ 2005 c 365 s 6; 1996 c 217 s 4; 1937 c 108 s 7; RRS s 8319. Prior: 1909 c 215 s 13.]